src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VTI_DAB_ADDITIONS 
mookdaan:mookod  VTI_AM_THEME "carve st"; !many words with /mookod/ for carving/carpentry/building
biindaabkinaan:biindaabikin    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 put sth. in the oven" ; !From Amy Debassige
!{From Rand database dump 2024
gboobdoon:giboobid   VTI_OO_THEME "1 draw New Year's season to a close"          ; !Rand key:n201622210-36-25n
gbagsidoon:gabagisid  VTI_OO_THEME           "1 lay sth. on thinly" ; !Rand key:n201622116-23-53n
gbaatoon:gVi1baat   VTI_OO_THEME           "1 put sth. on to boil" ; !Rand key:n201622116-8-23n
gaashkaawdoon:gaashkaawad   VTI_OO_THEME           "1 take all of sth. away" ; !Rand key:n201622114-46-47n
gezkobdoon:gezVv1kobid          VTI_OO_THEME           "1 be able to catch sth. [in time], be able to get hold of sth. [in time], be able to grab sth. [in time] (of moving objects)"          ; !Rand key:n20162237-10-38n
ggiibsidoon:gigiibisid                    VTI_OO_THEME           "1 leave sth. in the way, place sth. so it's in the way" ; !Rand key:n20162245-32-19n
ggwetaanbidetooni:gagwetaanibidet          VTI_OO_THEME           "1 drive sth. fast, run sth. at great speed, make sth. go fast (of machines)" ; !Rand key:n201622417-54-3n
gjibdoon:gijibid          VTI_OO_THEME           "1 jiggle sth. to see if it opens something, try turning sth." ; !Rand key:n201622711-10-52n
baapiiwegsatoon:baapiiwegsat                    VTI_OO_THEME "1 shake the dust from sth. [sheetlike, such as a rug], shake particles from sth. [sheetlike]"; !Rand key:n20163239-35-26n
desiigsatoon:desiigVv1sat                    VTI_OO_THEME           "1 throw sth. down [forcefully spread out] (of clothlike things)" ; !Rand key:n201632223-12-43n
gshko'oodoon:gashkohood          VTI_OO_THEME           "1 knot sth. securely"          ; !Rand key:n20163117-4-17n
gshkaasdoon:gVv1shkaasid          VTI_OO_THEME           "1 throw sth. so it curves in flight (i.e. a curve ball)" ; !Rand key:n201622717-21-33n
gtimiikaan:gitimiik                          VTI_AM_THEME           "1 work at sth. half-heartedly, work half-heartedly in taking care of sth." ; !Rand key:n20163512-24-29n
gonendaan:agonend                          VTI_AM_THEME           "1 have sth. in one's mouth" ; !Rand key:n201622716-37-5n
gndaajiishkwenaan:gondaajiishkwen       VTI_AM_THEME           "1 push sth. into the mud" ; !Rand key:n201622715-54-56n
giizhaaddaan:giizhaadad                          VTI_AM_THEME           "1 finish recounting a story about sth., finish telling a story about sth." ; !Rand key:n201622615-56-58n
giishkwewegnaandaan:giishkweweganaand   VTI_AM_THEME           "1 cut off a story, cut off music" ; !Rand key:n201622511-17-36n
giishkdiyaandaan:giishkidiyaand                  VTI_AM_THEME           "1 cut off one's stool in the process of passing it, cut sth. by clenching one's buttocks" ; !Rand key:n201622511-10-35n
giishkaaddaan:giishkaadod                  VTI_AM_THEME           "1 abruptly stop talking about sth." ; !Rand key:n201622511-6-0n
giibganaandaan:giibiganaand                  VTI_AM_THEME           "1 knock sth. over the edge of something [such as a counter]" ; !Rand key:n20162256-40-9n
giizhkwaadaan:giizhigwaad                  VTI_AM_THEME           "1 finish sewing sth." ; !Rand key:n201622417-57-27n
ggwetaan'ganaandaan:gagwetaaniganaand   VTI_AM_THEME           "1 wallop sth., give sth. (an.) a solid whack (CL, M’Ch, Sg, Wk);  2 sing a song with extreme verve (M’Ch, Sg, Wk)" ; !Rand key:n201622417-26-47n
ggiibaazaabndaan:gagiibaazaaband          VTI_AM_THEME           "1 think sth. looks stupid" ; !Rand key:n20162245-13-45n
gezkowaabndaan:gezikowaaband                  VTI_AM_THEME           "1 catch sight of sth." ; !Rand key:n20162237-33-34n
genooshknaan:genooshkVv1n                  VTI_AM_THEME           "1 show off sth. (e.g. money)" ; !Rand key:n201622213-43-32n
gdaakiiyedaabaadaan:gidaakiiwedaabaad   VTI_AM_THEME           "1 drive sth. up the hill [hauling], haul sth. up the hill, pull sth. up the hill, tow sth. up the hill" ; !Rand key:n201622211-58-6n
gaashkndaan:gaashkand                          VTI_AM_THEME           "1 scrape sth. clean [in eating], lick sth. empty in eating" ; !Rand key:n201622114-55-42n
gaashkaabka'aan:gaashkaabikah                  VTI_AM_THEME           "1 scrape sth." ; !Rand key:n201622114-43-18n
gaakaashpjii'aan:gaakaashpijiih                  VTI_AM_THEME           "1 scrape sth. [with the hands or an instrument]" ; !Rand key:n201622112-59-54n
gaachkodaan:agaachikod                          VTI_AM_THEME           "1 cut a small piece of sth., cut sth. into a small piece" ; !Rand key:n201621810-50-30n
biidaagmipdaan:biidaagamipid                  VTI_AM_THEME           "1 be able to taste sth. [in a liquid], detect the taste of sth. [in a liquid]" ; !Rand key:n201611217-28-9n
jiingdaasdoon:jiingadaasid                  VTI_OO_THEME            "1 throw a sinker, throw a splitter [in baseball]" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdd3648454d851323320a01dd02n
!Rand database dump end}
giizhbii'aan:giizhibiih  VTI_AM_THEME "1 finish writing sth." ; !from MC sentences. not in opd
piitganaandaan:apiitiganaand            VTI_AM_THEME                "hit sth. with such force" ; !from MC sentences
disaan:adis                             VTI_AM_THEME                "paint sth."    ; !from AM sentences, looks like d/t variability in OPD
gwekwendaan:gwayakwend    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 be certain about sth., be sure about sth." ; !UNREDUCED UR for gwekwendaan (reduced UR in originals: Rand key:n65663965417n)
nboobiikaanaa:niboobiikaan  VTA_TAG " 1 make soup with sth (an.)" ;  !from AK sentences, this looks like a verb with a relational suffix
pagnjiwdoon:apaganjiwid   VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 carry sth. to a certain spot, deliver sth. to a certain spot [in hauling]" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd50d20405ba16023320a01dd02n
pagdoon:apagad   VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 throw sth., toss sth., pitch sth. (as in baseball)" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd410b44f7b9dc823320a01dd02n
zhenaan:azhen   VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 turn sth. back [rejecting it]" ; !Rand key:n103000779688n the [a] has been sourced from the OPD.

LEXICON VTI_AM_THEME 
+VTI:am1  VTI_ORDERS_GET ;
+VTI:0  VTI_BASE_DERIV ;

LEXICON VTI_OO_THEME 
+VTI:oo   VTI_ORDERS_GET ;
+VTI:0  VTI_BASE_DERIV ;

LEXICON VTI_I_THEME 
+VTI:i   VTI_ORDERS_GET ;
+VTI:0  VTI_BASE_DERIV ;

LEXICON VTI
aate'aan:aateh    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 extinguish sth., put sth. out (of fire, something on fire)" ; !Rand key:n72973947521n
baapiitoozhaan:baapiitoozh    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 cut sth. into layers" ; !Rand key:n72974662870n
bdakbase'aan:badakabaseh    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 spear sth." ; !Rand key:n72976252462n
biibaagndaan:biibaagind    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 scream at sth." ; !Rand key:n72974477979n
biindgeshkaan:biindigeshk    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 enter sth." ; !Rand key:n72977377769n
bkizhaan:bakizh    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 cut sth. (of strings)" ; !Rand key:n72977642766n
bngo'aan:bangoh    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 dust sth. with powder, sprinkle powder [e.g. insecticide] on sth. (farming)" ; !Rand key:n72978963384n
bshigwaakwaadaan:bashigwaakwaad    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 graze sth. shooting at it" ; !Rand key:n72982179254n
bzwendaan:bizwend    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 think sth. unfit to eat" ; !Rand key:n72985239740n
daashkshkaan:daashkishk    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 split sth. [by kicking it], split sth. [with one's weight]" ; !Rand key:n72988477371n
dnizaan:n5daniz    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 cook sth. in a certain pot;  2 cook sth. for a certain amount of time (Wp)" ; !Rand key:n73014378088n
gdigjiiwebshkaan:godigojiiwebishk    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 tip sth. over [with one's weight], roll sth. over [with one's weight]" ; !Rand key:n73019481582n
gkendaan:gikend    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 know about sth., know sth.; realize sth.;  2 realize sth." ; !Rand key:n73028449193n
gwiishkshindaan:gwiishkoshind    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 whistle at sth." ; !Rand key:n73031816729n
mbaakwaan:ombaakwah    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 jack sth. up" ; !Rand key:n73032751187n
msawnaan:misawin    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 be attracted by [the looks of] sth., find sth. attractive" ; !Rand key:n71430433496n
naazhnaan:naazhin    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 lower sth." ; !Rand key:n71431149335n
niisaaknaan:niisaakon    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 dismantle sth., take sth. apart" ; !Rand key:n71431839920n
shaw'aan:zhashawah    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 butter sth., put a spread on sth., spread sth. [on an object] (of food)" ; !Rand key:n7303407566n !TRUNCATED VERSION REMOVED, see otw/debugging/candidates_for_spellrelax_rules.txt
wmboondaan:omboond    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 [see mboondaan]" ; !Rand key:n73072083346n
zhiigoonaan:zhiigoon    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 sort out sth. [to keep or discard], weed out sth. [to keep or discard]" ; !Rand key:n73035140060n
gnjibtwaadaan:ginjibatwaad    VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 flee with sth., run off with sth." ; !Rand key:n20114120-9-12n
aandgoodoon:aandagood    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 hang sth. elsewhere" ; !Rand key:n73023656530n
aatwaasdoon:aatawaasid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 place sth. right side up, place sth. face up" ; !Rand key:n72974048977n
baapiiwsidoon:baapiiwVv1sid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 shake dust or crumbs from sth. by striking it against something" ; !Rand key:n72975246908n
bdaksidoon:badakisid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 erect sth., stand sth. somewhere" ; !Rand key:n72976255541n
biigsidoon:biigosid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 break sth. [by dropping it], break sth. [by striking it against something]" ; !Rand key:n72977242820n
biisboodoon:biisibood    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 grind sth." ; !Rand key:n72977455476n
bkwesdoon:bakwesid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 chip sth. [by striking it on something] " ; !Rand key:n72977657595n
bnibdoon:banibid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 miss sth. reaching to grasp it" ; !Rand key:n72978964293n
bshkobdoon:bashkobid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 pluck sth., pull sth. out (of weeds and hair)" ; !Rand key:n72982181139n
daanzhebdoon:daanzhebid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 dim the lights on sth." ; !Rand key:n72987337333n
dgowdoon:dagowid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 carry sth. [along with other things], transport sth. [along with other things]" ; !Rand key:n73004843479n
gaakbidoon:gaakVv1bid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 tear sth." ; !Rand key:n73016049916n
ggwejtoon:gagwejit    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 try to do sth. [again and again], practice doing sth. (of skills being learned)" ; !Rand key:n73021036935n
giishpnadoon:giishpVi1nad    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 buy sth." ; !Rand key:n73023753421n
gwaabdoon:agwaabid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 pull sth. out [of water or fire], take sth. out [of water or fire]" ; !Rand key:n73031627587n
maajiiyaasdoon:maajiiyaasid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 blow sth. away, cause sth. to blow away" ; !Rand key:n71429141605n
n'gaabaawdoon:ningaabaawad    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 dissolve sth. in liquid, liquify sth., melt sth." ; !Rand key:n71431570931n
napdoon:inapid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 tie sth. in a certain manner, tie sth. [in preparation]" ; !Rand key:n71431167417n
nsaabkibdoon:nisaabikibid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 pull the trigger of sth." ; !Rand key:n73033842804n
waawyesdoon:waawiyesid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 set sth. down in a circle" ; !Rand key:n7303276312n
zhaabwidoon:zhaabowid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 carry sth. through [to safety], rescue sth., save sth." ; !Rand key:n73033432706n
baatiindoon:baatiinad    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 [see baatiintoon]" ; !Rand key:n20113268-49-59n
bskiigsidoon:baskiigisid    VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 arrange sth. so it’s folded, arrange sth. into a fold" ; !Rand key:n201612214-40-47n
miijin:miij    VTI_I_THEME    " 1 eat sth." ; !Rand key:n71429656803n
naadin:naad    VTI_I_THEME    " 1 go get sth." ; !Rand key:n71430856231n
naawkwe-miijin:naawakwe-miij    VTI_I_THEME    " 1 eat sth. for lunch" ; !Rand key:n73099854047n
kizhebaa-miijin:gigizhebaa-miij    VTI_I_THEME    " 1 eat sth. for breakfast" ; !Rand key:n73099844394n
bgone'aan:bagoneh VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 make a hole in sth. [with an instrument], put a hole in sth. [with an instrument]" ; !Rand key:n72976846814n
